Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.020

Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter apply to all cities of the first class that have a population of less than three hundred thousand, to all cities of the second class, and to all towns, except those cities and towns that have adopted an ordinance under RCW 35.34.040 providing for a biennial budget.

[ 1997 c 361 s 14; 1985 c 175 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.33.020. Prior: 1923 c 158 s 8; RRS s 9000-8.]